Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4026
Construction of authority generally.

Except as otherwise provided
in the power of attorney, by executing a power of attorney that incorporates
by reference a subject described in sections 30-4027 to 30-4040 or that grants
to an agent authority to do all acts that a principal could do pursuant to
subsection (3) of section 30-4024, a principal authorizes the agent, with
respect to that subject, to:

(1) Demand, receive,
and obtain by litigation or otherwise, money or another thing of value to
which the principal is, may become, or claims to be entitled, and conserve,
invest, disburse, or use anything so received or obtained for the purposes
intended;

(2)
Contract in any manner with any person, on terms agreeable to the agent, to
accomplish a purpose of a transaction and perform, rescind, cancel, terminate,
reform, restate, release, or modify the contract or another contract made
by or on behalf of the principal;

(3) Execute, acknowledge, seal, deliver, file, or
record any instrument or communication the agent considers desirable to accomplish
a purpose of a transaction, including creating at any time a schedule listing
some or all of the principal's property and attaching it to the power of attorney;

(4) Initiate, participate
in, submit to alternative dispute resolution, settle, oppose, or propose or
accept a compromise with respect to a claim existing in favor of or against
the principal or intervene in litigation relating to the claim;

(5) Seek on the principal's
behalf the assistance of a court or other governmental agency to carry out
an act authorized in the power of attorney;

(6) Engage, compensate, and discharge an attorney,
accountant, discretionary investment manager, expert witness, or other advisor;

(7) Prepare, execute,
and file a record, report, or other document to safeguard or promote the principal's
interest under a statute or regulation;

(8) Communicate with any representative or employee
of a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, on
behalf of the principal;

(9)
Access communications intended for, and communicate on behalf of the principal,
whether by mail, electronic transmission, telephone, or other means; and

(10) Do any lawful act
with respect to the subject and all property related to the subject.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 26.